Ohio, session 136, HB711.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3317.13 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 3317.13. (A) As used in this section and section 3317.14 of the Revised Code: (1) "Years of service" includes the following: (a) All years of teaching service in the same school district or educational service center, regardless of training level, with each year consisting of at least one hundred twenty days under a teacher's contract; (b) All years of teaching service in a chartered, nonpublic school located in Ohio as a teacher licensed pursuant to section 3319.22 of the Revised Code or in another public school, regardless of training level, with each year consisting of at least one hundred twenty days under a teacher's contract; (c) All years of teaching service in a chartered school or institution or a school or institution that subsequently became chartered or a chartered special education program or a special education program that subsequently became chartered operated by the state or by a subdivision or other local governmental unit of this state as a teacher licensed pursuant to section 3319.22 of the Revised Code, regardless of training level, with each year consisting of at least one hundred twenty days; and (d) All years of active military service in the armed forces of the United States, as defined in section 3307.75 of the Revised Code, to a maximum of five years. For purposes of this calculation, a partial year of active military service of eight continuous months or more in the armed forces shall be counted as a full year. (2) "Teacher" means all teachers employed by the board of education of any school district, including any cooperative education or joint vocational school district and all teachers employed by any educational service center governing board. (B) No teacher shall be paid a salary less than that provided in the schedule set forth in division (C) of this section. In calculating the minimum salary any teacher shall be paid pursuant to this section, years of service shall include the sum of all years of the teacher's teaching service included in divisions (A)(1)(a), (b), (c), and (d) of this section; except that any school district or educational service center employing a teacher new to the district or educational service center shall grant such teacher a total of not more than ten years of service pursuant to divisions (A)(1)(b), (c), and (d) of this section. Upon written complaint to the director of education and workforce that the board of education of a district or the governing board of an educational service center governing board has failed or refused to annually adopt a salary schedule or to pay salaries in accordance with the salary schedule set forth in division (C) of this section, the director shall cause to be made an immediate investigation of such complaint. If the director finds that the conditions complained of exist, the director shall order the board to correct such conditions within ten days from the date of the finding. No moneys shall be distributed to the district or educational service center under this chapter until the director has satisfactory evidence of the board of education's full compliance with such order. Each teacher shall be fully credited with placement in the appropriate academic training level column in the district's or educational service center's salary schedule with years of service properly credited pursuant to this section or section 3317.14 of the Revised Code. No rule shall be adopted or exercised by any board of education or educational service center governing board which restricts the placement or the crediting of annual salary increments for any teacher according to the appropriate academic training level column. (C) Minimum salaries exclusive of retirement and sick leave for teachers shall be as follows: 1 2 3 4 5 A Years of Service Teachers with Less than Bachelor's Degree Teachers with a Bachelor's Degree Teachers with Five Years of Training, but no Master's Degree Teachers with a Master's Degree or Higher 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 A Per Cent* Dollar Amount Per Cent* Dollar Amount Per Cent* Dollar Amount Per Cent* Dollar Amount B 0 86.5 30,275 100.0 35,000 103.8 36,330 109.5 38,325 C 1 90.0 31,500 103.8 36,330 108.1 37,835 114.3 40,005 D 2 93.5 32,725 107.6 37,660 112.4 39,340 119.1 41,685 E 3 97.0 33,950 111.4 38,990 116.7 40,845 123.9 43,365 F 4 100.5 35,175 115.2 40,320 121.0 42,350 128.7 45,045 G 5 104.0 36,400 119.0 41,650 125.3 43,855 133.5 46,725 H 6 104.0 36,400 122.8 42,980 129.6 45,360 138.3 48,405 I 7 104.0 36,400 126.6 44,310 133.9 46,865 143.1 50,085 J 8 104.0 36,400 130.4 45,640 138.2 48,370 147.9 51,765 K 9 104.0 36,400 134.2 46,970 142.5 49,875 152.7 53,445 L 10 104.0 36,400 138.0 48,300 146.8 51,380 157.5 55,125 M 11 104.0 36,400 141.8 49,630 151.1 52,885 162.3 56,805 1 2 3 4 A Years of Service Teachers with a Master's Degree in Any Field Teachers with a Master's Degree in a Related Field Teachers with Higher than a Master's Degree 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 A Per Cent* Dollar Amount Per Cent* Dollar Amount Per Cent* Dollar Amount B 0 109.5 38,325 112.5 39,375 115.5 40,425 C 1 114.3 40,005 117.3 41,055 120.3 42,105 D 2 119.1 41,685 122.1 42,735 125.1 43,785 E 3 123.9 43,365 126.9 44,415 129.9 45,465 F 4 128.7 45,045 131.7 46,095 134.7 47,145 G 5 133.5 46,725 136.5 47,775 139.5 48,825 H 6 138.3 48,405 141.3 49,455 144.3 50,505 I 7 143.1 50,085 146.1 51,135 149.1 52,185 J 8 147.9 51,765 150.9 52,815 153.9 53,865 K 9 152.7 53,445 155.7 54,495 158.7 55,545 L 10 157.5 55,125 160.5 56,175 163.5 57,225 M 11 162.3 56,805 165.3 57,855 168.3 58,905 * Percentages represent the percentage which each salary is of the base amount. For purposes of determining the minimum salary at any level of training and service, the base of one hundred per cent shall be the base amount. The percentages used in this section show the relationships between the minimum salaries required by this section and the base amount and shall not be construed as requiring any school district or educational service center to adopt a schedule containing salaries in excess of the amounts set forth in this section for corresponding levels of training and experience. As used in this division: (1) "Base amount" means thirty-five thousand dollars. (2) "Five years of training" means at least one hundred fifty semester hours, or the equivalent, and a bachelor's degree from a recognized college or university. (3) "Related field" means a field related to the subject area the teacher is assigned to teach. (D) For purposes of this section, all credited training shall be from a recognized college or university. Section 2. That existing section 3317.13 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.